District of Columbia statutes.
29-105.12

Action by Attorney General.

The Attorney General for the District of Columbia may maintain an action to enjoin a foreign filing entity or foreign limited liability partnership from doing business in the District in violation of this title.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720